District of Columbia statutes.
2-139

Inspector of Elevators and Fire Escapes.

One of the Assistant Inspectors of Buildings shall hereafter also perform the duties of Inspector of Elevators and Fire Escapes, without additional compensation.

Aug. 7, 1894, 28 Stat. 244, ch. 232
Elevators, regulation of construction, repair and operation, see § 1-303.44.
1981 Ed., § 1-1027.
1973 Ed., § 1-729.
New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1984: The “Apartment House Elevator Act of 1984” (D.C. Law 5-132, Mar. 13, 1985, 32 DCR 1717).